Vermont, session 2025-2026, H613.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 5301 is amended to read:
§ 5301. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Disposition” means the sentencing or determination of penalty or
punishment to be imposed upon a person convicted of a crime or against whom
a finding of sufficient facts for conviction is made.
(2) “Family member” means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, next of kin,
domestic partner, or legal guardian of a victim.
(3) “Restitution” means money or services that a court orders a
defendant to pay or render to a victim as a part of the disposition.
(4) “Victim” means a person who sustains physical, emotional, or
financial injury or death as a direct result of the commission or attempted
commission of a crime, or act of delinquency, or officer-involved shooting of
an individual experiencing a mental health crisis and shall also include
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 3 of 15
includes the family members of a minor, a person who has been found to be
incompetent, or a homicide victim.
(5) “Affected person” means any of the following persons who has
requested notification in writing from the court or the Department of
Corrections:
(A) witnesses;
(B) jurors;
(C) family members who are not covered by subdivision (4) of this
section; or
(D) any other persons who demonstrate to the court that the release or
escape of a defendant will constitute a threat of physical, emotional, or
financial injury or death.
* * *
(8) “Officer-involved shooting” means a law enforcement officer who
discharges a firearm in the performance of the officer’s duties.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 5351 is amended to read:
§ 5351. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Board” means the Victims Compensation Board established under
this chapter.
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 4 of 15
(2) “Dependent” means the victim’s spouse, domestic partner, or a
person who is legally dependent for support upon a victim. To qualify as a
domestic partner, a couple shall share a residence for at least six months prior
to applying, be 18 years of age or older, not be married to anyone, and not be
related by blood closer than would bar marriage under State law.
(3) “Crime” includes delinquent acts and an act of terrorism, as defined
in 18 U.S.C. § 2331, committed outside the United States against a resident of
this State.
(4) “Injury” means actual bodily harm or pregnancy, or emotional harm
resulting from the crime.
(5) “Pecuniary loss” means, in the case of a victim, the amount of
medical or medically related expenses, loss of wages, property damage,
cleanup of biological or hazardous materials or fluids, and any other expenses
that the Board feels became necessary as a direct result of the crime. Medical
or medically related expenses may include, but are not limited to, the costs of
individual or family psychological, psychiatric, or mental health counseling
and the costs of replacing or repairing eyeglasses, hearing aids, dentures, or
any prosthetic devices that were taken, lost, or destroyed during the
commission of the crime. In the case of a dependent, “pecuniary loss” means
the cost of psychological, psychiatric, or mental health counseling, funeral
expenses for the victim, property damage, cleanup of biological or hazardous
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 5 of 15
materials, and, upon demonstration of financial hardship, temporary living
expenses.
(6) “Unreimbursed pecuniary loss” means a pecuniary loss:
(A) that is not covered by medical, hospitalization, or disability
insurance or workers’ compensation; and
(B) that has not been ordered by the court to be restored to the victim
or dependent by the person who caused the loss; or
(C) that has been ordered by the court to be restored to the victim or
dependent but has not been paid by the person who caused the loss.
(7) “Victim” means:
(A) a person who sustains injury or death as a direct result of the
commission or attempted commission of a crime or officer-involved shooting
of an individual experiencing a mental health crisis;
(B) an intervenor who is physically injured or killed in an attempt to
assist the person described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (7) or a
protected professional as defined in subdivision 1028(d)(1) of this title;
(C) a surviving immediate family member of a homicide victim or
the victim of an officer-involved shooting of an individual experiencing a
mental health crisis, including a spouse, domestic partner, parent, sibling,
child, grandparent, or other survivor who may suffer severe emotional harm as
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 6 of 15
a result of the victim’s death as determined on a case-by-case basis in the
discretion of the Board; or
(D) a resident of this State who is injured or killed as the result of a
crime or officer-involved shooting of an individual experiencing a mental
health crisis committed outside the United States.
(8) “Profits from crimes” means:
(A) any property obtained through or income generated from the
commission of a crime in for which the defendant was convicted;
(B) any property obtained by or income generated from the sale,
conversion, or exchange of proceeds of a crime, including any gain realized by
such sale, conversion, or exchange;
(C) any property that the defendant obtained or any income generated
as a result of having committed the crime, including any assets obtained
through the use of unique knowledge acquired during the commission of or in
preparation for the commission of the crime, as well as any property obtained
or income generated from the sale, conversion, or exchange of such property
and any gain realized by such sale, conversion, or exchange; and
(D) any property that the defendant obtained or any income generated
from the sale of tangible property the value of which is increased by the
notoriety gained from the conviction commission of an offense by the person
accused or convicted of the crime.
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 7 of 15
(9) “Officer-involved shooting” has the same meaning as in subdivision
5301(8) of this title.
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 5353 is amended to read:
§ 5353. APPLICATION FOR COMPENSATION
(a) A victim or a dependent of a victim shall, upon application, be eligible
for compensation if:
(1) a law enforcement official has filed a report concluding that a crime
was committed, or an officer-involved shooting of an individual experiencing a
mental health crisis occurred, which resulted in the injury or death of the
victim; and
(2) the crime or officer-involved shooting of an individual experiencing
a mental health crisis was committed in this State; or
(3) the victim is a Vermont resident, the state in which the crime
occurred does not have an eligible crime Victims Compensation Program, and
the applicant would have been eligible for compensation under this chapter if
the crime had been committed in this State; or
(4) the victim is a Vermont resident who is injured or killed by an act of
terrorism outside the United States, to the extent that compensation is not
otherwise available under federal law.
(b) Victims of crimes subject to federal jurisdiction, and their dependents,
shall be eligible for compensation on the same basis as victims of State crimes.
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 8 of 15
(c) The application for compensation shall be signed by the applicant and
shall contain at least the following information, which shall be provided
subject to the penalties of perjury:
(1) A description of the date, nature, and circumstances of the crime.
(2) A complete financial statement, including pecuniary losses and the
extent to which the applicant has been or may be indemnified for these
expenses from any source.
(3) When appropriate, a statement indicating the extent of any disability
resulting from the injury.
(4) When reasonably available, copies of all law enforcement reports
and reports from all health care providers who treated or examined the victim
at the time of or after the crime or who treated or examined the dependent.
(5) The applicant’s Social Security number for the purpose of making
cash payment to the applicant in accordance with section 5356 of this title.
(d) In any case in which the person entitled to compensation under this
chapter is a minor or is mentally incompetent or unable to apply because of his
or her the person’s physical condition, the application may be made on the
person’s behalf by a parent, spouse, guardian, or other person authorized to
administer the estate.
(e) In any case in which a victim otherwise eligible for compensation under
this chapter dies without making an application, the Board may, upon
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 9 of 15
application, award medical or medically related expenses and pecuniary losses
to the victim’s estate.
(f) The Board may award funeral expenses and pecuniary expenses to the
next of kin of a deceased victim who is not survived by a dependent.
(g) A victim or a dependent of a victim shall be eligible for compensation
for pecuniary losses sustained as a result of a crime that occurred after July 1,
1987, if the losses occurred on or after July 1, 1990.
(h) A victim who is under the age of 18 years of age at the time the
application for compensation is filed shall be eligible for compensation for
pecuniary losses sustained as a result of a crime, no matter when the crime
occurred, if the losses occurred on or after July 1, 1990.
(i) A victim shall be eligible for compensation for pecuniary losses
sustained as a result of a crime which that occurred before July 1, 1987, if at
the time of application the case is being investigated or is being prosecuted.
Sec. 4. 13 V.S.A. § 5361a is added to read:
§ 5361a. VICTIM GUARDIANS
(a) There is created the position of victim guardian within the Center for
Crime Victim Services. Victim guardians shall be independent of any criminal
investigation or prosecution in order to provide conflict-free advocacy for
victims. Victim guardians shall coordinate with the Department of State’s
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 10 of 15
Attorneys and Sheriffs’ Victim Advocate Program and other victim advocacy
organizations as appropriate.
(b) Victim guardians shall perform services in accordance with the job
descriptions established and maintained by the Center for Crime Victim
Services, including providing assistance to family members of a person who
was a victim of an officer-involved shooting of an individual experiencing a
mental health crisis. Such assistance shall include coordinating with the family
to make arrangements for the cleanup of biological or hazardous materials or
property damage at the scene of the incident and the disposition of human
remains. At the request of the family, payment of such expenses shall be made
directly from the Center for Crime Victim Services to vendors. Family that
does not make such a request for direct payment may apply to the Victims
Compensation Fund for reimbursement of expenses as provided in section
5353 of this title.
Sec. 5. 20 V.S.A. § 2365c is added to read:
§ 2365c. MENTAL HEALTH CRISIS TRAINING
(a) In order to remain certified, law enforcement officers shall receive by
January 1, 2028, at least 15 hours of mental health crisis training in a program
approved by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council and the Vermont
Department of Mental Health.
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 11 of 15
(b) Law enforcement officers shall receive mental health crisis retraining
every two years in a program approved by the Vermont Criminal Justice
Council.
(c) The Vermont Police Academy shall employ a mental health crisis
trainer for the sole purpose of training Vermont law enforcement and related
practitioners on issues related to mental health crises.
Sec. 6. 20 V.S.A. § 2368 is amended to read:
§ 2368. STANDARDS FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT USE OF FORCE
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
* * *
(3) “Force” means the physical coercion employed by a law
enforcement officer to compel a person’s compliance with the officer’s
instructions.
(4) “Imminent threat of death or serious bodily injury” means when,
based on the totality of the circumstances, a reasonable officer in the same
situation would believe that a person has the present ability, opportunity, and
apparent intent to immediately cause death or serious bodily injury to the law
enforcement officer or another person. An imminent threat is not merely a fear
of future harm, no matter how great the fear and no matter how great the
likelihood of the harm, but is one that, from appearances, must be immediately
addressed and confronted.
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 12 of 15
(5) “Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in section
2351a of this title.
(6) “Totality of the circumstances” means the conduct and decisions of
the law enforcement officer leading up to the use of force and all facts known
to the law enforcement officer at the time, including the conduct of the person
or persons involved.
(b) Use of force.
(1) Whether the decision by a law enforcement officer to use force was
objectively reasonable shall be evaluated from the perspective of a reasonable
officer in the same situation, based on the totality of the circumstances. A law
enforcement officer’s failure to use feasible and reasonable alternatives to
force shall be a consideration for whether its use was objectively reasonable.
(2) A law enforcement officer shall use only the force objectively
reasonable, necessary, and proportional to effect an arrest, to prevent escape, or
to overcome resistance of a person the officer has reasonable cause to believe
has committed a crime or to achieve any other lawful law enforcement
objective.
(3) The authority of law enforcement to use physical force is a serious
responsibility that shall be exercised judiciously and with respect for human
rights and dignity and for the sanctity of every human life. Every person has a
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 13 of 15
right to be free from excessive use of force by officers acting under authority
of the State.
(4) The decision by a law enforcement officer to use force shall be
evaluated carefully and thoroughly, in a manner that reflects the gravity of that
authority and the serious consequences of the use of force by law enforcement
officers, in order to ensure that officers use force consistent with law and with
agency policies.
(5) When a law enforcement officer knows that a subject’s conduct is
the result of a medical condition, mental impairment, developmental disability,
physical limitation, language barrier, drug or alcohol impairment, or other
factor beyond the subject’s control, the officer shall take that information into
account in determining the amount of force appropriate to use on the subject, if
any. Unless impracticable, a law enforcement officer who encounters a subject
experiencing the conditions described in this subdivision shall employ de-
escalating tactics prior to using any force, including:
(A) avoiding forced entry into a residence unless there is an
imminent threat of death or serious bodily injury;
(B) employing time, distance, and containment measures to reduce
the probability of confrontation;
(C) permitting mental health professionals to lead crisis engagement,
if these professionals are present; or
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 14 of 15
(D) involving natural supports to de-escalate the encounter, including
family, friends, or other trusted persons.
(6) A law enforcement officer who makes or attempts to make an arrest
need not retreat or desist from his or her the officer’s efforts by reason of the
resistance or threatened resistance of the person being arrested. A law
enforcement officer shall not be deemed an aggressor or lose the right to self-
defense by the use of proportional force if necessary in compliance with
subdivision (2) of this subsection to effect the arrest or to prevent escape or to
overcome resistance. For the purposes of this subdivision, “retreat” does not
mean tactical repositioning or other de-escalation tactics.
(7) A law enforcement officer has a duty to intervene when the officer
observes another officer using a chokehold on a person.
* * *
Sec. 7. POSITIONS; APPROPRIATIONS
(a) Two full-time, classified permanent positions for victim guardian are
created in the Vermont Center for Crime Victim Services.
(b) There is appropriated to the Vermont Center for Crime Victim Services
from the General Fund in fiscal year 2027 the sum of:
(1) $230,000.00 for two victim guardians; and
VT LEG #385372 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.613
2026 Page 15 of 15
(2) $20,000.00 for the purpose of paying the following expenses related
to an officer-involved shooting of an individual experiencing a mental health
crisis:
(A) cleanup of biological or hazardous materials or fluids at the scene
of the shooting and repairs to property damage; and
(B) disposition of human remains.
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385372 v.2